Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.08
Leased property; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of leased property sold to a lessee of that property under an agreement whereby certain rental payments are credited against the purchase price of that property, except that this exemption shall not exceed the amount for which the lessor has collected and paid tax on such rental payments.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 32;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 38.